Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB6.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) No form of ranked-choice voting method shall be used
in determining the election or nomination of any candidate to any federal,
state, county or other municipal elected office.
(b) As used in this section, the term "ranked-choice voting" means a
form of voting that allows voters to rank two or more candidates for an
elected office in order of preference and tabulates the cast ballots in
multiple rounds with the elimination of the lowest vote-receiving
candidate after each round until a candidate receives a majority of the
votes cast.
(c) Any ordinance, resolution or regulation prohibited by subsection
(a) that was adopted prior to July 1, 2025, shall be null and void.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.